District of Columbia statutes.
21-141

Possession of property.

On the execution of his bond, a guardian is entitled to an order of the court directing the real and personal estate of the ward to be delivered into his possession, and all legacies and distributive shares to which the ward is entitled to be paid or delivered to him when they are properly payable or distributable according to law.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 741, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
1981 Ed., § 21-141.
1973 Ed., § 21-141.